Maryland, session 2026, HB1527.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
1A–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Acupuncture Board.
1A–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an
individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice acupuncture
in this State.
2–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Board” means the State Board of Examiners for Audiologists, Hearing Aid
Dispensers, Speech–Language Pathologists, and Music Therapists.
2–301.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS
ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice
audiology, hearing aid dispensing, speech–language pathology, or music therapy, or assist
in the practice of speech–language pathology or audiology in this State.
3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners.
3–301.

HOUSE BILL 1527 3
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an
individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice chiropractic in
this State.
4–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Dental Examiners.
4–301.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS
ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board to practice dentistry before the
individual may practice dentistry on a human being in this State.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS
ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board to practice dental hygiene before the
individual may practice dental hygiene on a human being in this State.
4–505.
(c) [After July 1, 1988] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE,
an individual must be certified by the Board as a dental radiation technologist before a
licensed dentist may employ the individual to practice dental radiation technology.
(d) [After July 1, 1988] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE,
an individual may not practice dental radiation technology unless certified by the Board.
5–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Dietetic Practice.
5–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE,
an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice dietetics in
the State.
6–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Massage Therapy Examiners.

HOUSE BILL 1527
6–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE,
before an individual may practice massage therapy in the State, the individual shall be:
(1) On or before October 31, 2026:
(i) Licensed by the Board; or
(ii) Registered by the Board to practice massage therapy in a setting
that is not a health care setting; or
(2) On or after November 1, 2026, licensed by the Board.
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Nursing.
8–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an
individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice registered
nursing in this State.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an
individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice licensed
practical nursing in this State.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an
individual shall be certified as an advanced practice registered nurse before the individual
may practice advanced practice registered nursing in this State.
8–6A–02.
(a) Subject to subsection (f) of this section and except as otherwise provided in
this subtitle OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an individual shall be certified by the Board
to practice as a nursing assistant, dialysis technician, or medication technician before the
individual may practice as a nursing assistant, dialysis technician, or medication
technician in the State.
(f) [An] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, AN individual
shall be certified by the Board to practice as a nursing assistant and as a dialysis technician

HOUSE BILL 1527 5
before the individual may practice as a dialysis technician in a State–owned hospital or
State–owned facility.
8–6B–07.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE,
an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice electrology
or teach an electrology education program in the State.
8–6C–06.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE,
an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice direct–entry
midwifery in the State.
8–6D–02.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE,
an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice certified
midwifery in the State.
9–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Long–Term Care Administrators.
9–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE,
an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice as a nursing
home administrator in this State.
9–3A–01.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE,
beginning July 1, 2026, an individual must be licensed by the Board before the individual
may practice as an assisted living manager in the State.
10–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Occupational Therapy Practice.
10–301.

HOUSE BILL 1527
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an
individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice occupational
therapy or limited occupational therapy in this State.
11–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Examiners in Optometry.
11–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an
individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice optometry in
this State.
11–404.1.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE OPTOMETRY IN THE STATE UNDER § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(a)] (B) Unless certified under this section, a licensed optometrist may not
administer or prescribe any therapeutic pharmaceutical agents or remove superficial
foreign bodies from a human eye, adnexa, or lacrimal system.
[(b)] (C) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Board
shall certify a licensed optometrist as a therapeutically certified optometrist if the licensed
optometrist submits to the Board evidence satisfactory to the Board that the licensed
optometrist:
(i) Has successfully completed at least 110 hours of a therapeutic
pharmaceutical agents course approved by the Board;
(ii) Has successfully passed a pharmacology examination relating to
the treatment and management of ocular disease, which is prepared, administered, and
graded by the National Board of Examiners in Optometry or any other nationally
recognized optometric organization as approved by the Secretary;
(iii) Is currently certified by the Board to administer topical ocular
diagnostic pharmaceutical agents under § 11–404 of this subtitle; and
(iv) Has successfully completed an 8–hour course in the management
of topical steroids approved by the Board.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, an
optometrist who has graduated on or after July 1, 2005 from an accredited school of

HOUSE BILL 1527 7
optometry recognized by the Board is not subject to the requirements of paragraph (1) of
this subsection.
(ii) If an optometrist who has graduated on or after July 1, 2005 from
an accredited school of optometry recognized by the Board is not certified under this section
within 3 years of graduation, the optometrist shall successfully complete a therapeutic
pharmaceutical agents course and successfully pass a pharmacology exam under paragraph
(1) of this subsection before the Board may certify the optometrist.
12–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy.
12–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an
individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice pharmacy in
this State.
12–6B–01.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an
individual shall be registered and approved by the Board as a pharmacy technician before
the individual may perform delegated pharmacy acts.
12–6D–02.
Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an
individual shall be registered and approved by the Board as a registered pharmacy intern
before the individual may practice pharmacy under the direct supervision of a licensed
pharmacist in accordance with this subtitle.
13–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Physical Therapy Examiners.
13–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an
individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice physical
therapy or limited physical therapy in this State.
14–101.

HOUSE BILL 1527
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Physicians.
14–301.
Except as otherwise provided in this title [or], § 13–516 of the Education Article, OR
§ 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice medicine in this State.
14–5A–08.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE,
an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice respiratory
care in this State.
14–5B–08.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 22–201 OF THIS
ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice
radiation therapy, radiography, nuclear medicine technology, or radiology assistance in this
State.
14–5C–08.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle[, on or after October 1, 2013,]
OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice polysomnography in this State.
14–5D–07.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE,
an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice athletic
training in the State.
14–5E–08.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle[, on or after October 1, 2013,]
OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice perfusion in this State.
14–5F–10.

HOUSE BILL 1527 9
(a) [Beginning March 1, 2016, except] EXCEPT as otherwise provided in this
subtitle OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board
before the individual may practice naturopathic medicine in the State.
14–5G–08.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle[, on or after January 1, 2024,]
OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice genetic counseling in the State.
15–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Board” means the State Board of Physicians, established under § 14–201 of
this article.
15–301.
(d) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS
ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice
as a physician assistant.
16–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners.
16–301.
[An] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, AN individual shall
be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice podiatry in this State.
17–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Board” means the State Board of Professional Counselors and Therapists.
17–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section OR § 22–201 OF
THIS ARTICLE, an individual may not practice, attempt to practice, or offer to practice
clinical alcohol and drug counseling, clinical marriage and family therapy, clinical

HOUSE BILL 1527
professional art therapy, or clinical professional counseling in the State unless licensed by
the Board.
17–401.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE ALCOHOL AND DRUG COUNSELING, MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPY,
PROFESSIONAL ART THERAPY, OR PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING IN THE STATE
UNDER § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(a)] (B) (1) This subsection only applies to individuals certified by the Board
as a certified professional counselor or certified professional counselor–marriage and family
therapist on or before September 30, 2008.
(2) (i) An individual shall be certified as a professional counselor by the
Board before the individual may:
1. Use the title “certified professional counselor”;
2. Use the initials “C.P.C.” after the name of the individual;
or
3. Represent to the public that the individual is certified as
a professional counselor.
(ii) A certificate to practice professional counseling issued by the
Board authorizes the certificate holder to practice professional counseling while the
certificate is effective.
(3) (i) An individual shall be certified as a professional
counselor–marriage and family therapist by the Board before the individual may:
1. Use the title “certified professional counselor–marriage
and family therapist”;
2. Use the initials “C.P.C.–M.F.T.” after the name of the
individual; or
3. Represent to the public that the individual is certified as
a certified professional counselor–marriage and family therapist.
(ii) A certificate to practice marriage and family therapy issued by
the Board authorizes the certificate holder to practice marriage and family therapy while
the certificate is effective.

HOUSE BILL 1527 11
[(b)] (C) (1) An individual shall be certified as a certified professional
counselor–alcohol and drug by the Board before the individual may:
(i) Use the title “certified professional counselor–alcohol and drug”;
(ii) Use the initials “C.P.C.–A.D.” after the name of the individual;
or
(iii) Represent to the public that the individual is certified as a
certified professional counselor–alcohol and drug.
(2) An individual shall be certified as a certified associate
counselor–alcohol and drug by the Board before the individual may:
(i) Use the title “certified associate counselor–alcohol and drug”;
(ii) Use the initials “C.A.C.–A.D.” after the name of the individual;
or
(iii) Represent to the public that the individual is certified as a
certified associate counselor–alcohol and drug.
(3) An individual shall be certified as a certified supervised
counselor–alcohol and drug by the Board before the individual may:
(i) Use the title “certified supervised counselor–alcohol and drug”;
(ii) Use the initials “C.S.C.–A.D.” after the name of the individual;
or
(iii) Represent to the public that the individual is certified as a
certified supervised counselor–alcohol and drug.
(4) A certificate to practice alcohol and drug counseling issued by the Board
authorizes the certificate holder to practice alcohol and drug counseling while the certificate
is effective.
17–6A–10.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle[, beginning January 1, 2015,]
OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice behavior analysis in the State.
18–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 1527
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists.
18–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE,
an individual shall be licensed or registered by the Board before the individual may practice
psychology as a psychologist or psychology associate in this State.
19–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Social Work Examiners.
19–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an
individual shall be:
(1) Licensed by the Board before the individual may practice social work in
this State while representing oneself as a social worker; or
(2) Licensed as a certified social worker–clinical before the individual may
practice clinical social work in this State.
20–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Board” means the State Board for Certification of Residential Child Care
Program Professionals.
20–301.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection OR § 22–201 OF THIS
ARTICLE, an individual shall receive a certificate from the Board before the individual may
be a program administrator in this State.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection[, on or before
October 1, 2015,] OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an individual shall receive a certificate
from the Board before the individual may be a residential child and youth care practitioner
in this State.
21–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 1527 13
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Environmental Health Specialists.
21–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 22–201 OF THIS ARTICLE, an
individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice as an
environmental health specialist in this State.
TITLE 22. COMPLEMENTARY AND ALTERNATIVE HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONERS.
SUBTITLE 1. DEFINITIONS.
22–101.
IN THIS TITLE, “COMPLEMENTARY OR ALTERNATIVE HEALTH CARE”
INCLUDES:
(1) ACUPRESSURE;
(2) ANTHROPOSOPHY;
(3) AROMATHERAPY;
(4) AYURVEDA;
(5) CRANIAL SACRAL THERAPY;
(6) CULTURALLY TRADITIONAL HEALING PRACTICES;
(7) DETOXIFICATION PRACTICES AND THERAPIES;
(8) ENERGETIC HEALING;
(9) POLARITY THERAPY;
(10) FOLK PRACTICES;
(11) HEALING PRACTICES USING FOOD, FOOD SUPPLEMENTS,
NUTRIENTS, AND THE PHYSICAL FORCES OF HEAT, COLD, WATER, TOUCH, AND
LIGHT;
(12) GERSON THERAPY;

HOUSE BILL 1527
(13) COLOSTRUM THERAPY;
(14) HEALING TOUCH;
(15) HERBOLOGY OR HERBALISM;
(16) HOMEOPATHY;
(17) IRIDOLOGY;
(18) BODYWORK;
(19) MEDITATION;
(20) MIND–BODY HEALING PRACTICES;
(21) REFLEXOLOGY AND REIKI;
(22) TRADITIONAL NATUROPATHY;
(23) NONINVASIVE INSTRUMENTALITIES;
(24) TRADITIONAL ORIENTAL PRACTICES;
(25) QIGONG; AND
(26) ENERGY HEALING.
SUBTITLE 2. AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE.
22–201.
SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS AND LIMITATIONS OF THIS TITLE, AN
INDIVIDUAL MAY PRACTICE COMPLEMENTARY OR ALTERNATIVE HEALTH CARE
WITHOUT OBTAINING A LICENSE, CERTIFICATION, OR OTHER AUTHORIZATION
ISSUED UNDER THIS ARTICLE.
22–202.
UNLESS THE INDIVIDUAL HOLDS A LICENSE, CERTIFICATION, OR OTHER
AUTHORIZATION ISSUED UNDER THIS ARTICLE THAT AUTHORIZES THE INDIVIDUAL
TO DO SO, AN INDIVIDUAL PRACTICING COMPLEMENTARY OR ALTERNATIVE HEALTH
CARE MAY NOT:

HOUSE BILL 1527 15
(1) REPRESENT TO THE PUBLIC THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS A LICENSED
HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER;
(2) RECOMMEND TO ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL TO DISCONTINUE
PRESCRIBED MEDICAL TREATMENT;
(3) PERFORM SURGERY;
(4) EXPOSE ANOTHER TO X–RAY RADIATION;
(5) SET A FRACTURE;
(6) PRESCRIBE OR DISPENSE A PRESCRIPTION DRUG OR
CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, AS DEFINED BY 21 U.S.C. § 812; OR
(7) MANIPULATE A SPINE OR OTHER JOINT.
22–203.
(A) AN INDIVIDUAL ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF A LICENSE,
CERTIFICATE, OR OTHER AUTHORIZATION ISSUED UNDER THIS ARTICLE IS NOT
SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(B) A COMPLEMENTARY OR ALTERNATIVE HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER
SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE EACH OF THE PRACTITIONER’S CLIENTS WITH A
WRITTEN NOTICE THAT CONTAINS:
(I) THE NAME, TITLE, BUSINESS ADDRESS, AND TELEPHONE
NUMBER OF THE PRACTITIONER;
(II) A STATEMENT INDICATING WHETHER THE PRACTITIONER
HOLDS A LICENSE, CERTIFICATE, OR OTHER AUTHORIZATION ISSUED BY A HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS BOARD UNDER THIS ARTICLE;
(III) A DESCRIPTION OF THE COMPLEMENTARY OR
ALTERNATIVE HEALTH CARE SERVICE THAT THE PRACTITIONER PROVIDES; AND
(IV) ANY EDUCATIONAL CREDENTIAL, TRAINING, EXPERIENCE,
OR OTHER QUALIFICATION HELD BY THE PRACTITIONER;

HOUSE BILL 1527
(2) OBTAIN A SIGNED WRITTEN ACKNOWLEDGEMENT THAT THE
CLIENT HAS RECEIVED THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION;
(3) RETAIN THE ACKNOWLEDGEMENT REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION AT LEAST 2 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE ACKNOWLEDGEMENT IS
SIGNED; AND
(4) PROVIDE THE CLIENT WITH A COPY OF THE ACKNOWLEDGEMENT
REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
22–204.
THIS TITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO WAIVE OR LIMIT ANY COMMON LAW
OR STATUTORY CLAIM FOR RELIEF THAT A PERSON MAY BRING AGAINST A
COMPLEMENTARY OR ALTERNATIVE HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.